Maryland, session 2025, HB1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–09.
(d) (1) (I) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a sports wagering
facility licensee may contract with any other sports wagering facility licensee to provide
sports wagering services on behalf of the licensee at a location where the licensee is
authorized to accept wagers on sporting events.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1134*

HOUSE BILL 1134
(II) A CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE THAT
PROVIDES SPORTS WAGERING SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A CLASS B SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE:
1. MAY UTILIZE THE CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY’S BRANDING AND LOYALTY REWARDS PROGRAMS AT THE CLASS B SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY ON BEHALF OF WHICH IT IS PROVIDING SPORTS WAGERING
SERVICES; BUT
2. MAY NOT ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO UTILIZE THE
ACCOUNT WALLET THAT THE INDIVIDUAL MAINTAINS WITH THE CLASS A SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY WHEN PLACING WAGERS WITH THE CLASS B SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE.
(III) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF A CLASS A SPORTS
WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE, A CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE
THAT RECEIVES SPORTS WAGERING SERVICES FROM A CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY LICENSEE MAY UTILIZE AND MARKET THE CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING
FACILITY LICENSEE’S BRANDING AND LOYALTY REWARDS PROGRAMS IN THE SAME
MANNER AS THE CLASS A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE.
(2) If a sports wagering licensee authorized to accept wagers at a stadium
under subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this section contracts with a video lottery operator, or an
affiliate or a subsidiary of that video lottery operator, to provide sports wagering services
at the stadium, the licensee may contract only with a video lottery operator, or an affiliate
or a subsidiary of that video lottery operator, that operates a video lottery facility located
in the same county as the stadium.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.